Massachusetts, session 194th, S2856.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of Chapter 22D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 11, the word "and".
SECTION 2. Section 2 of Chapter 22D, as so appearing, is further amended by striking
out, in lines 11, 12, 13 and 14, the words “of hazardous materials under the charge of a director
to be known as the director of hazardous materials, the director of hazardous materials shall
administer the regional hazardous material response teams” and inserting in place thereof, the
following new language:- “and a division of special operations under the charge of a director to
be known as the director of special operations. The special operations division shall include the
include hazardous materials emergency response teams and technical rescue emergency response
teams.”
SECTION 3. Section 6 of Chapter 22D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
out, in line 6 of subsection (a), the words “each technical rescue region” and inserting in place
thereof the following new words:- “the state fire marshal”.
of 4

SECTION 4. Section 6 of Chapter 22D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
out subsection (b) in its entirety and inserting the following new language:-
“(b) There is hereby established within the department a technical rescue coordinating
council, which shall serve as an advisory council to the state fire marshal. Said council shall
review the development of standards, rules, procedures and regulations for technical rescue
emergency response and cost recovery. The council shall consist of the secretary of public safety
or a designee; the state fire marshal or a designee; and five members to be appointed by the
governor, 2 of whom shall be members of the Fire Chief’s Association of Massachusetts, Inc., 2
of whom shall be members of the Professional Fire Fighters of Massachusetts; and 1 of whom
shall be selected from a list comprised of 1 nominee from each technical rescue region as
selected by the regional technical rescue steering committees. The governor shall appoint
members for a term of 3 years and any such member shall be eligible for reappointment. A
person shall not receive compensation for service as a member of the council but may receive
reimbursement for all expenses necessarily incurred in connection with the member's official
duties. A member shall hold office until a successor is appointed.
The majority of the council shall constitute a quorum to conduct business but a lesser
number may adjourn from time to time. Every two years, the council shall elect a chair and vice-
chair from among its members.”
SECTION 5. Section 6 of Chapter 22D, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out, in line 32 of subsection (c), the word “develop” and inserting in its place, the
following new language:- “advise the state fire marshal on the development of”.
of 4

SECTION 6. Section 6 of Chapter 22D, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out, in line 36 of subsection (d), the word “establish” and inserting in its place, the
following new language:- “advise the state fire marshal on the establishment of”.
SECTION 7. Section 6 of Chapter 22D, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out subsection section (e) in its entirety and inserting the following new paragraphs:-
“The department, acting through the division of special operations, administered by the
state fire marshal or his designee, shall prepare and from time to time update a technical rescue
response plan.
The department may, at the request of the local fire department or on its own authority,
dispatch member departments of the technical rescue response plan to a site in the
commonwealth for the purpose of conducting a technical rescue response. During a technical
rescue response, the team leader shall have complete operational authority for technical rescue
emergency response team operations at all times. Once the team leader has determined that the
imminent danger of the technical rescue incident has been satisfactorily mitigated, the team
leader shall thereafter notify the incident commander. The incident commander shall have
authority over the technical rescue response site during a technical rescue response.”
SECTION 8. Section 6 of Chapter 22D, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
adding the following new paragraph at the end of subsection (f):- “Any technical rescue response
action taken by a member department under the technical rescue response plan shall be deemed
to have been taken on behalf of the department and for the benefit of the commonwealth for the
purpose of implementing the provisions of this chapter.”
of 4

SECTION 9. Section 6 of Chapter 22D, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out, in line 54 of subsection (g), the words “the department of fire services, in
consultation with the technical rescue coordinating council may promulgate,” and inserting in
place, the following new language:- “the state fire marshal may promulgate rules and regulations
to implement this section”.
SECTION 10. Section 6 of Chapter 22D, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
adding the following new subsection:
“(h) The commonwealth shall, subject to appropriation, reimburse a municipality for
costs incurred for the technical rescue response of its qualified members of a technical rescue
response team and shall pay an annual stipend up to $5,000 to each qualified member of that
team. Qualification shall be established by the state fire marshal.”
SECTION 11. Section 2DDDDD of Chapter 29, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the second sentence in its entirety.
SECTION 12. Section 2DDDDD of Chapter 29, as so appearing, is hereby amended
inserting after the word “contract”, in line 4, the following new words:- “for services or
otherwise”.
SECTION 13. Section 2DDDDD of Chapter 29, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “expended”, in line 15, the following new words:- “by the state fire
marshal, as head of the department of fire services, who shall act as administrator of the fund,".
of 4